New York, session 2025-2026, S4880.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 Melissa Baker, a member of the New York state and local police and fire 3 retirement system covered under section 384-d of the retirement and 4 social security law, who was employed as a police officer with the 5 village of Blasdell between August 3, 2004 and August 14, 2005, and who, 6 for reasons not ascribable to her own negligence, was not granted 7 service credit under section 384-d of the retirement and social security 8 law for such period of employment with the village of Blasdell, shall be 9 granted such service credit under section 384-d of the retirement and 10 social security law and shall be entitled to the full rights and bene- 11 fits associated with coverage under such section as well as section 12 384-e of such law, provided that a request to that effect is filed with 13 the state comptroller within one year from the effective date of this 14 act. 15 § 2. All past service costs incurred in implementing the provision of 16 this act shall be borne by the village of Blasdell and may be amortized 17 over a five-year period. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would grant service credit under section 384-d, together with section 384-e, of the Retirement and Social Security Law (RSSL) to Melissa Baker, a Tier 2 member of the New York State and Local Police and Fire Retirement System employed by the Niagara Frontier Transporta- tion Authority, for the period August 3, 2004 through August 14, 2005, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01245-04-5 S. 4880 2 during which time they were employed as a police officer with the Village of Blasdell. This bill will not increase the future annual contributions of the Niagara Frontier Transportation Authority. In addition to the annual contributions discussed above, there will be an immediate past service cost of approximately $40,500 which will be borne by the Village of Blasdell as a one-time payment. This estimate assumes that payment will be made on February 1, 2026. If the Village of Blasdell elects to amortize this cost over a 5-year period, the cost for each year including interest would be $9,060. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2024 was used in measuring the impact of the proposed change, the same data used in the April 1, 2024 actuari- al valuation. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2024 Report of the Actuary and the 2024 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2024 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The Market Assets and GASB Disclosures are found in the March 31, 2024 New York State and Local Retirement System Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the proposed change nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the professional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated February 12, 2025, and intended for use only during the 2025 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note No. 2025-8. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System, I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applica- ble Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of which I am a member.